Maine, session 132, LD2196.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. 5 MRSA §3122, sub-§3, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 459, §3, is
amended to read:
F. Develop proposals for consideration by the legislative oversight committee on
potential methods to improve consumer experience with the health care system,
including the provision of a consumer advocacy function on health care matters not
addressed by the Health Insurance Consumer Assistance Program established in Title
24‑A, section 4326 or the Department of Professional and Financial Regulation,
Bureau of Insurance, Consumer Health Care Division established in Title 24‑A, section
4321; and
Sec. A-2. 5 MRSA §3122, sub-§3, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 459, §3, is
amended to read:
G. Provide staffing assistance to the Maine Prescription Drug Affordability Board
established in chapter 167.;
Sec. A-3. 5 MRSA §3122, sub-§3, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. Based on financial data reported by a hospital to the Maine Health Data
Organization in accordance with Title 22, section 8709, determine whether a hospital
is financially distressed for the purposes of Title 22, section 1730-B, subsection 4,
paragraph C;
Sec. A-4. 5 MRSA §3122, sub-§3, ¶I is enacted to read:
I. Monitor compliance with Title 22, section 1730-B. In carrying out this duty, the
office may request from a hospital or an insurer information necessary to review and
audit compliance and, upon request, an insurer or hospital shall provide any requested
information. Any proprietary information requested by the office under this paragraph
is confidential. For the purposes of this paragraph, "proprietary information" means
information that is a trade secret or production, commercial or financial information
the disclosure of which would impair the competitive position of the hospital or insurer
submitting the information and would make available information not otherwise
publicly available; and
Sec. A-5. 5 MRSA §3122, sub-§3, ¶J is enacted to read:
J. Monitor the impact of the implementation of Title 22, section 1730-B on the quality
and accessibility of hospital care in this State and on the costs of nonhospital services.
The office may adopt rules pursuant to subsection 10 as necessary to address its duties
under this paragraph.
Sec. A-6. 22 MRSA §1730-B is enacted to read:
§1730-B. Hospital facility price growth ceiling; maximum and minimum pricing
requirements for services
1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
the following terms have the following meanings.
A. "General hospital" has the same meaning as in section 7932, subsection 2-A.
Page 1 - 132LR2841(01)

B. "Hospital facility price" means the total amount a hospital expects to receive for
health care services, including both the amount paid to a hospital by any insurer or plan
sponsor and any payment received directly from an insured or uninsured individual for
institutional services.
C. "Insurer" has the same meaning as in Title 24-A, section 3952, subsection 6.
D. "Plan sponsor" means any person, other than an insurer, that establishes or
maintains a health plan covering residents of this State, including, but not limited to,
plans established or maintained by 2 or more employers or jointly by one or more
employers and one or more employee organizations, associations, committees, joint
boards of trustees or other similar groups of representatives of the parties that establish
or maintain the plan. "Plan sponsor" does not include the MaineCare program; the
federal Medicare program; the Civilian Health and Medical Program for the Uniformed
Services, known as TRICARE; the Federal Employees Health Benefits Program; the
United States Department of Health and Human Services, Indian Health Service; or
any program providing health benefits administered by the United States Department
of Veterans Affairs.
2. Hospital facility price growth ceiling. Beginning January 1, 2028 and annually
thereafter, the annual growth of hospital facility prices in this State is limited to a
percentage equal to the inpatient prospective payment system hospital market basket
established by the federal Medicare program. Beginning January 1, 2028, a general
hospital may not:
A. Enter into a contract with any insurer or plan sponsor in which the growth of the
allowed amount for any inpatient or outpatient facility service exceeds the hospital
facility price growth ceiling for that plan year; or
B. Charge or collect payment for any inpatient or outpatient facility service in an
amount that exceeds the prior year's price for that same service by more than the
hospital facility price growth ceiling for that plan year, including any amount charged
to or collected from an insurer, plan sponsor or individual or any other source with
respect to the service.
3. Maximum price for inpatient and outpatient services. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection 4, beginning January 1, 2028, a general hospital may not:
A. Charge or collect payment from any insurer, plan sponsor or patient for any
inpatient or outpatient facility service in an amount that exceeds 200% of the Medicare
rate for the same service in the same geographic area. If a general hospital has an
aggregate average commercial price that exceeds 225% of the Medicare rate on January
1, 2028, the hospital may comply with this paragraph by reducing the aggregate
average commercial price relative to the rate paid by Medicare by 25 percentage points
annually until the hospital's charge for any inpatient or outpatient service does not
exceed 200% of the Medicare rate;
B. Enter into a contract with any insurer or plan sponsor in which the allowed amount
paid for any inpatient or outpatient facility service exceeds 200% of the Medicare rate
for the same service in the same geographic area; or
C. Charge or collect payment for any amount exceeding the allowed amount for a
covered health care service pursuant to this subsection, except for any applicable
Page 2 - 132LR2841(01)

415 in-network coinsurance, deductible or copayment amount, including any amount
426 charged to or collected from an insurer, plan sponsor or individual or any other source
437 with respect to the service.
4. Exceptions. The maximum prices required by subsection 3 do not apply to:
A. Charges for services to a critical access hospital;
B. Charges for services made under a contract with an insurer or plan sponsor unless
the insurer or plan sponsor complies with the requirements for utilization review and
prior authorization in Title 24-A, sections 4304, 4304-A and 4304-B and for the
minimum allowed amount for primary care and behavioral health care services in Title
24-A, section 4320-A, subsection 3-C; or
C. Charges for services made to a general hospital determined to be financially
distressed by the Office of Affordable Health Care. A determination of financial
distress is valid for a period of no less than one year.
5. Enforcement. A hospital that fails to comply with the requirements of subsection
2 or 3 commits a civil violation for which a fine equal to at least 110%, and no more than
200%, of any charge exceeding the caps set forth in subsection 2 or 3 may be adjudged.
6. Self-insured health benefit plans. This section may not be construed to apply to
an entity providing or administering a self-insured health benefit plan that is subject to the
federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 29 United States Code,
Sections 1001 to 1461 (1988), except as provided in subsection 4, paragraph B for such an
entity that elects to be subject to the provisions of this section. An entity providing or
administering a self-insured health benefit plan that elects to be subject to the requirements
for utilization review and prior authorization in Title 24-A, sections 4304, 4304-A and
4304-B and for the minimum negotiated charge for in-network primary care service and
behavioral health care evaluation and management service as provided in Title 24-A,
section 4320-A, subsection 3-C shall provide notice, on an annual basis, to the Office of
Affordable Health Care, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the office, attesting to
the entity's election to be subject to those provisions. The entity shall amend the entity's
health benefit plan, coverage policy, contract and any other plan documents to reflect that
the provisions of this section apply to the health benefit plan's members.
PART B
Sec. B-1. 24-A MRSA §4304-B is enacted to read:
§4304-B. Prior authorization for treatment of chronic conditions
1. Chronic condition defined. For the purposes of this section, "chronic condition"
means a medical condition diagnosed by a health care provider that is expected to last 6
months or more and that:
A. Requires ongoing medical attention by a health care provider to effectively manage
the condition or to prevent an adverse health event; or
B. Limits one or more activities of daily living, as defined in Title 22, section 1717,
subsection 1, paragraph A.
2. Length of prior authorization for treatment of chronic conditions. If a carrier
requires a prior authorization for health care services for the treatment of a chronic
Page 3 - 132LR2841(01)

413 condition, an approved prior authorization remains valid for one year. If health care
424 services for the treatment of a chronic condition are necessary for more than one year, a
435 carrier may not require the renewal of the prior authorization more frequently than once
446 every 2 years, except when a new treatment protocol is introduced for the chronic condition.
457 The prior authorization approval is valid from the date the enrollee receives the notice of
468 the approval.
3. Length of prior authorization for diagnostic procedures or tests related to
treatment of chronic conditions. A prior authorization for a diagnostic procedure or test
related to the treatment of a chronic condition remains valid for subsequent, necessary
recurring orders of the diagnostic procedure or test for one year. A carrier may not require
the renewal of a prior authorization more frequently than once every 2 years for a diagnostic
procedure or test that continues for more than one year, and the prior authorization approval
remains valid from the date the enrollee receives notice of the approval.
4. Coverage restriction prohibition; notice. A carrier may not restrict coverage for
a health care service, diagnostic procedure or test used in the treatment of a chronic
condition under this section, including coverage for a prescription, that received prior
authorization approval under a previous carrier within 90 days of enrollment in the carrier's
health plan by an enrollee if that enrollee's health care provider determines that the enrollee
should continue receiving that health care service, diagnostic procedure, test or prescribed
drug as determined by a health care provider and, with respect to a prescribed drug, if the
prescribed drug is included on the health plan's formulary at the time of that enrollee's
enrollment. The carrier shall provide the enrollee with at least 90 days' notice prior to
restricting coverage pursuant to this subsection.
PART C
Sec. C-1. 24-A MRSA §2736-C, sub-§2, ¶K is enacted to read:
K. For each rate filing submitted for the 2028 plan year and each plan year thereafter,
a carrier shall provide in a format determined by the superintendent detailed
information on the experience period and projected trend in both utilization and per-
unit payment by benefit category and by hospital.
Sec. C-2. 24-A MRSA §2808-B, sub-§2-A, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. For each rate filing submitted for the 2028 plan year and each plan year thereafter,
a carrier shall provide in a format determined by the superintendent detailed
information on the experience period and projected trend in both utilization and per-
unit payment by benefit category and by hospital.
Sec. C-3. 24-A MRSA §4320-A, sub-§3-C is enacted to read:
3-C. Minimum negotiated charge for in-network primary care service or
behavioral health care evaluation and management service. The minimum negotiated
charge of a carrier for any in-network primary care service or behavioral health care
evaluation and management service may not be less than 110% of the Medicare rate for the
same service in the same geographic area.
Page 4 - 132LR2841(01)